Utah statutes.
63B-2-203.   Bond proceeds may be used to pay costs of issuance and sale.

The proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter shall be used for the purposes described in Section 63B-2-202 and to pay all or part of any cost incident to the issuance and sale of the bonds including, without limitation, printing, registration and transfer costs, legal fees, trustees' fees, financial advisors' fees, and underwriters' discount.



Enacted by Chapter 304, 1993 General Session

